Georgia, session 2025_26, HB501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended in Code Section 21-2-30, relating to creation, membership,
terms of service, vacancies, quorum, bylaws, meetings, and executive director, by revising
subsection (b) as follows:
"(b) A member elected by a house of the General Assembly shall take office on the day
following the adjournment of the regular session in which elected and shall serve for a term
of two years and until his or her successor is elected and qualified, unless sooner removed.
An elected member of the board may be removed at any time the General Assembly is in
session by a majority vote of the house which elected him or her, or at any time when the
H. B. 501
- 1 -

LC 47 3124
General Assembly is not in session by the President of the Senate if such member was
elected by the Senate or by the Speaker of the House of Representatives if such member
was elected by the House of Representatives. In the event a vacancy should occur in the
office of such a member of the board at a time when the General Assembly is not in
session, then the President of the Senate shall thereupon appoint an elector to fill the
vacancy if the prior incumbent of such office was elected by the Senate or appointed by the
President of the Senate; and the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall thereupon
appoint an elector to fill the vacancy if the prior incumbent of such office was elected by
the House of Representatives or appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
A member appointed to fill a vacancy may be removed at any time by a majority vote of
the house whose presiding officer appointed him or her in the same manner as a member
elected by a house of the General Assembly."
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 501
- 2 -